Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.915

Savings—Statute of limitations—1982 1st ex.s. c 8.

Nothing in chapter 8, Laws of 1982 1st ex. sess., affects or impairs any right to benefits existing prior to *the effective date of this act. For injuries occurring on and after July 1, 1981, and before *the effective date of this act, the statute of limitations for filing claims under this chapter shall begin to run on *the effective date of this act.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 8 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: For "the effective date of this act," see note following RCW 7.68.035.

Effective dates—Intent—Reports—1982 1st ex.s. c 8: See notes following RCW 7.68.035.